udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N3 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX N3 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N3 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX N3 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
